Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-163
Guardian ad litem; appointment; order approving agreement; considerations.

(1) Before approving an agreement under section 43-162, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem if the prospective adoptee is not already represented by a guardian ad litem, and the guardian ad litem of the prospective adoptee shall represent the best interests of the child concerning such agreement. The court may enter an order approving the agreement upon motion of one of the prospective adoptee's birth parents or one of the prospective adoptive parents if the terms of the agreement are approved in writing by the prospective adoptive parent or parents and the birth parent or parents and if the court finds, after consideration of the recommendations of the guardian ad litem and the Department of Health and Human Services and other factors, that such communication with the birth parent or parents and the maintenance of birth family history would be in the best interests of the prospective adoptee.

(2) In determining if the agreement is in the best interests of the prospective adoptee, the court shall consider the following factors as favoring communication with the birth parent or parents: Whether the prospective adoptee and birth parent or parents lived together for a substantial period of time; the prospective adoptee exhibits attachment or bonding to such birth parent or parents; and the adoption is a foster-parent adoption with the birth parent or parents having relinquished the prospective adoptee due to an inability to provide him or her with adequate parenting.

Laws 1993, LB 205, § 9;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 125;

Laws 1998, LB 1041, § 18.